Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 15.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201079-310
State Board
of Education; members; election.

The State Board
of Education shall be composed of eight members who shall be elected as provided
in section 32-511. The Commissioner
of Education shall not be a member of the State Board of Education.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 2, p. 1054;

Laws 1967, c. 527, § 1, p. 1750;

Laws 1991, LB 619, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 589;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-322;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 138;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 15.

Constitutional provisions:

Creation, Article VII, section 3, Constitution of Nebraska.

Membership, requirements, Article VII, section 3, Constitution of Nebraska.

Filing fees, see section 32-608.

Nomination, nonpolitical, see section 32-609.